California statutes. Financial Code
 lobby of each agency and branch office, except an automated teller machine branch office (as defined in Section 1330), a notice that any person may obtain a financial report from the bank. The notice shall include the address and telephone number of the person or office to be contacted for a financial report. The bank shall, promptly after receiving a request for a financial report, mail or otherwise furnish the financial report to the requester. The first financial report shall be provided without charge.

(2) The financial report called for in this subdivision shall contain either (A) the information that the commissioner may require by regulation or (B) in the absence of a regulation, the last balance sheet and income statement, each without any schedules, that the bank filed with the commissioner pursuant to Section 453.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.

Each foreign (other nation) bank which is licensed to maintain a depositary agency, limited branch office, or wholesale branch office shall, in accordance with such regulations as the commissioner may prescribe, give notice that deposits in such office are not insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1809.

(a) In case a foreign (other nation) bank is licensed to maintain a depositary agency or branch office and such office is not subject to the regulations of the Depository Institutions Deregulation Committee, Regulation Q of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, or Part 329 of the regulations of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, such bank shall, with respect to deposits accepted at the office, comply with such regulations regarding maximum
 interest rates on deposits, prepayment of time deposits, and related matters as the commissioner may prescribe as being necessary and appropriate to maintain competitive equality between foreign (other nation) banks and banks organized under the laws of this state which are subject to the regulations of the Depository Institutions Deregulation Committee, Regulation Q of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, or Part 329 of the regulations of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(b) For purposes of, and notwithstanding any contrary provisions of, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, whenever the commissioner adopts a regulation or order of repeal of a regulation under subdivision (a), the commissioner may, without describing specific facts showing the need for immediate action, find that adoption of such regulation or order of repeal is necessary for the
 immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare, and such regulation or order of repeal shall be deemed to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1810.

(a) Each foreign (other nation) bank which is licensed to transact business in this state shall keep the assets of such business separate and apart from the assets of its business outside this state.

(b) The creditors of the business in this state of a foreign (other nation) bank which is licensed to transact business in this state shall be entitled to priority over other creditors with respect to the
 assets of such bank’s business in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1811.

(a) In this section:

(1) “Adjusted liabilities,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank, means the liabilities of such bank’s business in this state, excluding (A) accrued expenses, (B) any liability to an office (whether in or outside of this state) or majority-owned subsidiary of the bank, and (C) such other liabilities as the commissioner may by regulation or order exclude.

(2) “Applicable minimum,” when used with respect to eligible assets deposited or to be deposited with an approved depository by a foreign (other nation) bank, means such amount as the commissioner may from time to time by regulation or order determine to be necessary for the maintenance of sound financial condition, for the protection of the interests of creditors of the bank’s business in this state, or for the protection of the public interest. However, in the case of a foreign (other nation) bank which is licensed to maintain a branch office, the applicable minimum shall in no event be less than 1 percent of the adjusted liabilities of such bank.

(3) “Approved depository,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank, means a bank organized under the laws of this state or a national bank headquartered in this state which has been selected by such foreign (other nation)
 bank and approved by the commissioner for the purpose of acting as the approved depository of the foreign (other nation) bank and which has filed with the commissioner, in such form as the commissioner may by regulation or order prescribe, an agreement to comply with all applicable provisions of this section and of any regulation or order issued under this section.

(4) “Eligible assets” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank, means any of the following:

(A) Cash.

(B) Any security of the type described in Section 1572.

(C) Any negotiable certificate of deposit which (i) has a maturity of not more than one year, (ii) is payable in the United States, and (iii) is issued by a bank organized under the laws of a state of the United States, by
 a national bank, or by a branch office of a foreign (other nation) bank which is located in the United States.

(D) Any commercial paper which is payable in the United States and which is rated P-1 or its equivalent by a nationally recognized rating service; provided, however, that any conflict in rating shall be resolved in favor of the lower rating.

(E) Any banker’s acceptance which is payable in the United States and which is eligible for discount with a Federal Reserve bank.

(F) Any other asset which the commissioner by regulation or order determines to be eligible.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this paragraph, “eligible asset,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank, does not include any instrument the issuer of which (i) is, or is
 affiliated with, such foreign (other nation) bank, (ii) is domiciled in, or controlled by a bank or other person domiciled in, the same foreign nation as the foreign (other nation) bank, or (iii) is, or is controlled by, such foreign nation. For purposes of the foregoing provision, to be “affiliated” means to control, to be controlled by, or to be under common control with; and to “control” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1250.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) The amount of adjusted liabilities of a foreign (other nation) bank’s business in this state shall be computed for such period, in such manner, and on such basis as the commissioner may by regulation or order prescribe.

(2) Any eligible asset shall be valued at the lesser of market or par.

(c) (1) Before any foreign (other nation) bank is licensed to transact business in this state, such bank shall deposit, and each foreign (other nation) bank which is licensed to transact business in this state shall maintain on deposit, with an approved depository eligible assets having a value in an amount not less than the applicable minimum.

(2) Whenever a foreign (other nation) bank which is licensed to transact business in this state ceases to be so licensed, such bank shall thereafter maintain on deposit with an approved depository eligible assets having a value in an amount not less than the applicable minimum for such period of time as the commissioner may determine to be necessary for the protection of creditors of the bank’s business in this state or for the protection of the public interest.

(d) (1) No foreign (other nation) bank which maintains eligible assets on deposit with an approved depository pursuant to this section shall withdraw any such eligible assets except with the prior approval of the commissioner.

(2) No approved depository which holds eligible assets on deposit from a foreign (other nation) bank pursuant to this section shall release any such eligible assets except with the prior approval of the commissioner or as otherwise provided in subdivision (h).

(e) Any foreign (other nation) bank which maintains eligible assets on deposit with an approved depository pursuant to this section shall, unless the commissioner shall have suspended or revoked its license to transact business in this state or taken possession of its property and business in this state, be entitled to receive any income paid on such eligible
 assets.

(f) (1) Whenever a foreign (other nation) bank deposits eligible assets with, or withdraws eligible assets from, an approved depository pursuant to this section, such bank shall do so in accordance with such procedures and requirements as the commissioner may by regulation or order prescribe.

(2) Whenever an approved depository receives, holds, or releases eligible assets pursuant to this section, such approved depository shall do so in accordance with such procedures and requirements as the commissioner may by regulation or order prescribe and shall file with the commissioner such reports as and when the commissioner may by regulation or order require.

(g) Whenever a foreign (other nation) bank maintains eligible assets on deposit with an approved depository pursuant to this
 section:

(1) The eligible assets shall be deemed to be pledged to the commissioner for the benefit of the creditors of the bank’s business in this state; and, notwithstanding any provision of the Uniform Commercial Code to the contrary, the commissioner, for the benefit of such creditors, shall be deemed to have a security interest in such eligible assets.

(2) The eligible assets shall be free from any lien, charge, right of setoff, credit, or preference in connection with any claim of the approved depository against the bank.

(h) (1) In case the commissioner takes possession of the property and business of a foreign (other nation) bank which maintains eligible assets on deposit with an approved depository pursuant to this section, such approved depository shall, upon order of the commissioner,
 release such eligible assets to the commissioner, as liquidator of the property and business of such bank.

(2) In case a foreign (other nation) bank which maintains eligible assets on deposit with an approved depository pursuant to this section fails to pay any judgment creditor of its business in this state and the commissioner has not taken possession of the property and business of such bank, such approved depository shall release such eligible assets to the commissioner, and the commissioner shall make such disposition of the eligible assets, as a court of competent jurisdiction of this state or of the United States may order for the benefit of such judgment creditor. For purposes of this paragraph, “judgment creditor of its business in this state” means a person to whom the bank is required to pay money under a judgment which (A) arose out of the bank’s business in this state, (B) has been entered by a court of this state or of the United
 States, (C) has become final, in that all possibility of direct attack on such judgment by way of appeal, motion for new trial, motion to vacate, or petition for extraordinary writ has been exhausted, and (D) has remained unpaid for a period of not less than 60 days after becoming final.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.

(a) In this section:

(1) “Adjusted liabilities,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank which is licensed to maintain a branch office in this state, means the liabilities of such bank’s business in this state, excluding (A) accrued expenses, (B) any liability to an office (whether in or outside of this state) or majority-owned subsidiary of the bank, and (C) such other liabilities as
 the commissioner may by regulation or order exclude.

(2) “Eligible assets” means any asset which the commissioner by regulation or order determines to be eligible for purposes of this section. However, “eligible asset,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank which is licensed to maintain a branch office, includes (A) any asset which such bank maintains on deposit pursuant to Section 1811 and (B) any reserves which the bank maintains with respect to its business in this state in accordance with requirements prescribed by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System.

(b) For purposes of this section, the amount of eligible assets and the amount of adjusted liabilities of a foreign (other nation) bank which is licensed to maintain a branch office in this state shall each be computed for such period, in such manner, and on such basis as the commissioner may by
 regulation or order prescribe.

(c) A foreign (other nation) bank licensed to maintain a branch office in this state shall hold at its branch offices in this state or at such other places as the commissioner may approve, eligible assets in such amount, if any, as the commissioner may from time to time by regulation or order determine to be necessary for the maintenance of sound financial condition, for the protection of the interests of creditors of the bank’s business in this state, or for the protection of the public interest. However, in no event shall such amount exceed 108 percent of the adjusted liabilities of the bank’s business in this state.

(d) If the commissioner finds, with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank licensed to maintain a branch office in this state, that such action is necessary for the maintenance of sound financial condition, for the protection of the
 interests of creditors of such bank’s business in this state, or for the protection of the public interest, the commissioner may order the bank to place all or part of the eligible assets which the bank is required to hold under subdivision (c) in the custody of such bank organized under the laws of this state or such national bank headquartered in this state as the commissioner may designate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1813.

(a) (1) No foreign (other nation) bank which is licensed to maintain an agency or branch office shall close such office unless the commissioner shall have first approved such closing.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not be deemed to prohibit a foreign (other nation) bank which is licensed to maintain an agency or branch office from closing such office in accordance with Article 4
 (commencing with Section 1825).

(b) If the commissioner finds the following with respect to an application by a foreign (other nation) bank for approval to close an agency or branch office, the commissioner shall approve such application:

(1) That it will not be unsafe or unsound for the bank to close the office; and

(2) That the closing of the office will not be substantially detrimental to the public convenience and advantage or that the closing of the office is necessary in the interests of the safety and soundness of the bank.

If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application.

(c) Whenever an application by a foreign (other nation) bank for approval to close an agency or
 branch office has been approved and all conditions precedent to such closing have been fulfilled, such bank may close such office and shall promptly thereafter surrender to the commissioner the license which authorized it to maintain the office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Voluntary Surrender of License [1825. - 1825.]

1825.

(a) Any foreign (other nation) bank that holds a license to maintain an office may voluntarily surrender the license by filing the license and a report with the commissioner. However, any foreign (other nation) bank that holds licenses to maintain two or more offices may not voluntarily surrender less than all of the licenses.

(b) (1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2),
 a voluntary surrender of a license shall be effective on the 30th day after the license and the report called for in subdivision (a) are filed with the commissioner or on an earlier date as the commissioner may by order specify.

(2) If a proceeding to revoke or suspend a license is pending at the time when the license and the report called for in subdivision (a) are filed with the commissioner or if a proceeding to revoke or suspend a license or to impose conditions upon the surrender of a license is instituted before the 30th day after the license and the report called for in subdivision (a) are filed with the commissioner, the voluntary surrender of the license shall become effective at the time and upon the conditions that the commissioner may by order specify.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Enforcement [1830. - 1835.]

1830.

If the commissioner finds that any person has violated any provision of this chapter or of any regulation or order issued under this chapter, the commissioner may order the person to pay to the commissioner a civil penalty imposed pursuant to Section 329.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1831.

If, after notice and a hearing, the commissioner finds any of the following with respect to a foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain an office, the commissioner may issue an order suspending or revoking the license of the bank:

(a) That the bank has violated any provision of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this division or any provision of any other applicable law, regulation, or
 order;

(b) That the bank, in case it is licensed to transact business in this state, is transacting the business in an unsafe or unsound manner or, in any case, is transacting business elsewhere in an unsafe or unsound manner;

(c) That the bank is in unsafe or unsound condition;

(d) That the bank has ceased to operate its office;

(e) That the bank is insolvent in that it has ceased to pay its debts in the ordinary course of business, it cannot pay its debts as they become due, or its liabilities exceed its assets;

(f) That the bank has suspended payment of its obligations, has made an assignment for the benefit of its creditors, or has admitted in writing its inability to pay its debts as
 they become due;

(g) That the bank is the subject of an order for relief in bankruptcy or has sought other relief under any bankruptcy, reorganization, insolvency, or moratorium law, or that any person has applied for any such relief under any such law against the bank and the bank has by any affirmative act approved of or consented to the action or the relief has been granted;

(h) That a receiver, liquidator, or conservator has been appointed for the bank or that any proceeding for such an appointment or any similar proceeding has been initiated in the place where the bank is domiciled;

(i) That the existence of the bank or the authority of the bank to transact banking business under the laws of the place where the bank is domiciled has been suspended or terminated; or

(j) That any fact or condition exists that, if it had existed at the time when the bank applied for its license to transact business in this state, would have been grounds for denying the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1832.

(a) If the commissioner finds that any of the factors set forth in Section 1831 is true with respect to any foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed to maintain an office and that it is necessary, in case the bank is licensed to transact business in this state, for the protection of the interests of creditors of the bank’s business in this state or, in any case, for the protection of the public interest that the commissioner immediately suspend or revoke the
 license of the bank, the commissioner may issue an order suspending or revoking the license of the bank.

(b) (1) Within 30 days after an order is issued pursuant to subdivision (a), the foreign (other nation) bank to which the order is issued may file with the commissioner an application for a hearing on the order. If the commissioner fails to commence the hearing within 15 business days after the application is filed with the commissioner (or within any longer period to which the bank consents), the order shall be deemed rescinded. Within 30 days after the hearing, the commissioner shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order; otherwise, the order shall be deemed rescinded.

(2) The right of any foreign (other nation) bank to which an order is issued under subdivision (a) to petition for judicial review of the order shall not be affected by the failure of the
 bank to apply to the commissioner for a hearing on the order pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1833.

Any foreign (other nation) bank whose license to maintain an office is suspended or revoked shall immediately surrender the license to the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1834.

(a) Any foreign (other nation) bank to which an order is issued under Section 1831 or 1832 may apply to the commissioner to modify or rescind such order. The commissioner shall not grant the application unless he or she finds that it is in the public interest to do so and that it is reasonable to believe that the bank will, if and when it is again licensed to maintain an office, comply with all applicable provisions of this division and of any regulation or order
 issued under this division.

(b) The right of any foreign (other nation) bank to which an order is issued under Section 1831 or 1832 to petition for judicial review of the order shall not be affected by the failure of the bank to apply to the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (a) to modify or rescind the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1835.

(a) If the commissioner finds that any of the factors set forth in Section 1831 is true with respect to any foreign (other nation) bank which is licensed to transact business in this state and that it is necessary for the protection of the interests of the creditors of such bank’s business in this state or for the protection of the public interest that he or she take immediate possession of the property and business of the bank, the commissioner may by order forthwith take possession of the property and business of the bank and retain possession until the bank resumes business in this state or is finally liquidated. The bank may, with the consent of the commissioner, resume business in this state upon such conditions as the commissioner may
 prescribe.

(b) (1) Whenever the commissioner takes possession of the property and business of a foreign (other nation) bank pursuant to subdivision (a), such bank may, within 10 days, apply to the superior court in the county in which the primary office of the bank is located to enjoin further proceedings. The court may, after citing the commissioner to show cause why further proceedings should not be enjoined and after a hearing, dismiss such application or enjoin the commissioner from further proceedings and order him or her to surrender the property and business of the bank to the bank or make such further order as may be just.

(2) The judgment of the court may be appealed by the commissioner or by the bank in the manner provided by law for appeals from
 the judgment of a superior court to the court of appeal. In case the commissioner appeals the judgment of the court, such appeal shall operate as a stay of the judgment, and the commissioner shall not be required to post any bond.

(c) Whenever the commissioner takes possession of the property and business of a foreign (other nation) bank pursuant to subdivision (a), the commissioner shall conserve or liquidate the property and business of the bank pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 550) and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 600) of Division 1, and the provisions of those chapters shall apply, except Sections 592, 593, and 690, as if the bank were a bank organized under the laws of this state.

(d) When the commissioner has completed the liquidation of the property
 and business of a foreign (other nation) bank, the commissioner shall transfer any remaining assets to such bank in accordance with such orders as the court may issue. However, in case the bank has an office in another state of the United States which is in liquidation and the assets of such office appear to be insufficient to pay in full the creditors of the office, the court shall order the commissioner to transfer to the liquidator of the office such amount of any such remaining assets as appears to be necessary to cover such insufficiency; if there are two or more such offices and the amount of remaining assets is less than the aggregate amount of insufficiencies with respect to the offices, the court shall order the commissioner to distribute the remaining assets among the liquidators of such offices in such manner as the court finds equitable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 44.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 21. International and Foreign Banking and Financing [1850. - 1910.]



  ARTICLE 1. International and Foreign Banking and Financing Corporations [1850. - 1897.]

1850.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires, “corporation” means a corporation organized under the laws of this state for the purpose of transacting business pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1851.

The provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 99) of Division 1 applicable to, or with respect to, banks shall apply to, or with respect to, as the case may be, corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1852.

When authorized by the previous written consent of the commissioner as provided by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1040) one or more persons may organize a corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1853.

The articles of a corporation shall provide that the purpose of the corporation is to engage in the business of international and foreign banking and other international and foreign financial operations, the business of banking and other financial operations in any dependency or insular possession of the United States, and any other lawful activities which are not, by applicable laws or regulations, prohibited to a corporation transacting business under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1854.

The articles of incorporation shall be submitted to the commissioner for his or her approval before they are filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to the Corporations Code. After the articles have been filed with the Secretary of State the corporation shall file with the commissioner a copy thereof, certified by the Secretary of State, and, after the organization meeting of the directors, a copy of its bylaws certified by its secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1855.

Each corporation shall have power, under such rules and regulations as the commissioner may prescribe:

(a) To purchase, sell, discount, and negotiate, with or without its endorsement or guaranty, notes, drafts, checks, bills of exchange, acceptances, including bankers’ acceptances, cable transfers, and other evidences of indebtedness; to purchase and sell, with or without its endorsement or guaranty, securities, including
 the obligations of the United States or of any state thereof but not including shares of stock in any corporation except as herein provided; to accept bills or drafts drawn upon it subject to such limitations and restrictions as the commissioner may impose; to issue letters of credit; to purchase and sell coin, bullion, and exchange; to borrow and to lend money; to issue debentures, bonds, and promissory notes under such general conditions as to security and such limitations as the commissioner may prescribe; to receive deposits outside of the United States and to receive only such deposits in this state or in any other state of the United States as may be incidental to or for the purpose of carrying out transactions in foreign countries or dependencies or insular possessions of the United States.

(b) Generally, to exercise such powers as are incidental to the powers conferred by this article or as may be usual, in the determination of the
 commissioner, in connection with the transaction of the business of banking or other financial operations in the countries, colonies, dependencies, or possessions in which it shall transact business and not inconsistent with the power specifically granted herein. Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to prohibit the commissioner, under his or her power to prescribe rules and regulations, from limiting the aggregate amount of liabilities of any or all classes incurred by the corporation and outstanding at any one time.

(c) To establish and maintain for the transaction of its business branches or agencies in foreign countries, their dependencies or colonies, and in any state of the United States, and in the dependencies or insular possessions of the United States, at such places as may be approved by the commissioner and under such rules and regulations as he or she may prescribe, including any state of the United States, or
 countries or dependencies not specified in the original organization certificate.

(d) With the consent of the commissioner to purchase and hold stock or other certificates of ownership in any other corporation organized under the laws of this state for the purpose of transacting business pursuant to this article, or under the laws of the United States, or under the laws of any foreign country or a colony of dependency thereof, or under the laws of any state, dependency or insular possession of the United States but not engaged in the general business of buying or selling goods, wares, merchandise, or commodities in the United States, and not transacting any business in the United States except such as in the judgment of the commissioner may be incidental to its international or foreign business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1856.

Except with the approval of the commissioner, no corporation shall invest in any one corporation an amount in excess of 10 percent of its own shareholders’ equity, except in a corporation engaged in the business of banking, when 15 percent of its shareholders’ equity may be so invested.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1857.

No corporation shall purchase, own, or hold stock or certificates of ownership in any other corporation organized under this article or under the laws of any state which is in substantial competition therewith, or which holds stock or certificates of ownership in corporations which are in substantial competition with the purchasing corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1858.

Nothing contained in this article shall prevent corporations from purchasing and holding stock in any corporation where such purchase shall be necessary to prevent a loss upon a debt previously contracted in good faith; and stock so purchased or acquired in corporations shall within six months from such purchase be sold or disposed of at public or private sale unless the time to so dispose of same is extended by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 45.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1859.

No corporation shall carry on any part of its business in the United States except such as, in the judgment of the commissioner, shall be incidental to its international or foreign business. Except such as is incidental and preliminary to its organization no corporation shall exercise any of the powers conferred by this article until it has been duly authorized by the commissioner to commence business under the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1860.

No corporation shall engage in commerce or trade in commodities except as specifically provided in this article, nor shall it either directly or indirectly control or fix or attempt to control or fix the price of any such commodities. The license of any corporation violating this section shall be subject to forfeiture as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.

It shall be unlawful for any director, officer, agent, or employee of any corporation to use or to conspire to use the credit, the funds, or the power of the corporation to fix or control the price of any commodities, and any person violating this section shall be punished by a fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by both that fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 13.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1862.

No corporation shall be organized without adequate shareholders’ equity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1863.

The provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1100) (except the provisions of Section 1121) applicable to, or with respect to, banks shall apply to, or with respect to, as the case may be, corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1864.

Any bank may invest in the shares of any corporation organized under the provisions of this article, but the aggregate amount of stock held in all corporations engaged in business of the kind described in this chapter shall not exceed 10 percent of the subscribing bank’s shareholders’ equity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1865.

(a) In this section, “foreign bank” means any company organized under the laws of a foreign country, a territory of the United States, Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, or the Virgin Islands, which engages in the business of banking, or any subsidiary or affiliate, organized under such laws, of any such company. “Foreign bank” includes, without limitation, foreign commercial banks, foreign merchant banks, and other foreign institutions that engage in banking
 activities usual in connection with the business of banking in the countries where such foreign institutions are organized or operating.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), a majority of the shares of the capital stock of any corporation shall at all times be held and owned by citizens of the United States, by corporations the controlling interest in which is owned by citizens of the United States, chartered under the laws of the United States or of a state of the United States, or by firms or companies, the controlling interest in which is owned by citizens of the United States.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (b), one or more foreign banks, institutions organized under the laws of foreign countries which own or control foreign banks, or banks organized under the laws of the United States, the states of the United States, or the District of
 Columbia, the controlling interests in which are owned by any such foreign banks or institutions, may, with the approval of the commissioner and upon such terms and conditions and subject to such rules and regulations as the commissioner may prescribe, own and hold 50 percent or more of the shares of the capital stock of any corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1866.

Whenever it shall appear to the commissioner that any corporation has violated the provisions of its articles of incorporation or any law of this state, or is conducting its business in an unsafe or unauthorized manner, or if the contributed capital of any such corporation is impaired, or if the corporation shall refuse to submit its books, papers and concerns to the inspection of any examiner of the department or if any officer thereof shall refuse to be examined upon oath touching the
 concerns of the corporation or if the corporation shall suspend payment of its obligations, or if from any examination or report provided for by this article the commissioner shall have reason to conclude that the corporation is in an unsound or unsafe condition to transact the business for which it is organized, or that it is unsafe and inexpedient for it to continue business, or if any corporation shall neglect or refuse to observe any order of the commissioner specified in Section 580 or 581, the commissioner may forthwith take possession of the property and business of such corporation and retain such possession until such corporation shall resume business, or its affairs be finally liquidated as provided by this code for the liquidation of banks.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1867.
